Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-408
Class IV school district; boundaries; body corporate; powers.

The territory now or hereafter embraced within each incorporated city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary class in the State of Nebraska that is not in part within the boundaries of a learning community, such adjacent territory as now or hereafter may be included therewith for school purposes, and such territory not adjacent thereto as may have been added thereto by law shall constitute a Class IV school district, except that nothing in this section shall be construed to change the boundaries of any school district that is a member of a learning community. A Class IV school district shall be a body corporate and possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes, may sue and be sued, and may purchase, hold, and sell such personal and real estate and contract such obligations as are authorized by law.

The title to all real or personal property owned by such school district shall, upon the organization of the school district, vest immediately in the school district so created. The board of education shall have exclusive control of all property belonging to the school district.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 1, p. 550;

C.S.1922, § 6610;

C.S.1929, § 79-2601;

R.S.1943, § 79-2601;

Laws 1947, c. 294, § 1(1), p. 907;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 244, p. 772;

Laws 1963, c. 489, § 1, p. 1561;

Laws 1971, LB 475, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 1142, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-901;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 157;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 14;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 22;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 15;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 5.